Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska32-1039
Canvass of votes by Legislature; when.

The votes cast for the officers of the executive departments of this state and members of the Public Service Commission shall be canvassed by the Legislature at its next regular session.

Laws 1994, LB 76, § 333.

Legislature is required to canvass votes cast for officers of the executive department. State ex rel. Caldwell v. Peterson, 153 Neb. 402, 45 N.W.2d 122 (1950).